Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 3

Tennessee Electronic Library

10-1-301. Created — Authority — Administration.

There is hereby created the Tennessee Electronic Library which shall be administered by the office of the secretary of state, division of Tennessee state library and archives, which has the authority to coordinate the delivery of electronic databases and other similar services to all libraries, both public and private, within Tennessee which desire to participate in the Tennessee electronic library. The office of the secretary of state, through the division of the state library and archives, has the authority to contract with vendors, for the purpose of purchasing services under state rules and regulations, to administer and facilitate the operation of the Tennessee Electronic Library. Notwithstanding the appropriation of funds, the costs of funding the project during the initial year of operation may be paid out of funds existing within the department of state.

Acts 1999, ch. 113, § 1; T.C.A. § 10-1-401.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 10-1-401 was transferred to § 10-1-301 by the code commission in 2012.

10-1-302. Four integrated components.

The Tennessee Electronic Library, in close cooperation with Tennessee's libraries and other organizations interested in and supportive of expanding and promoting superior library services, shall be composed of four (4) integrated components:

Subscriptions to commercial online products both through a free core database access package composed of products of general interest to all Tennesseans available to all libraries and other subscriptions of specific interest paid for by libraries participating in the Tennessee Electronic Library;

Organization and technical support for start-up and ongoing services;

Computing storage capacity; and

Training for Tennessee librarians and library users.

Acts 1999, ch. 113, § 1; T.C.A. § 10-1-402.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 10-1-402 was transferred to § 10-1-302 by the code commission in 2012.

10-1-303. Purpose — Access to catalogues, databases, collections, etc.

The Tennessee Electronic Library may provide access to, but shall not be limited to:

Available online catalogs of the holdings of participating libraries in Tennessee;

Local produced databases of specialized collections in Tennessee; and

Other holdings, collections, and subscriptions deemed appropriate by the participating libraries and agencies.

Acts 1999, ch. 113, § 1; T.C.A. § 10-1-403.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 10-1-403 was transferred to § 10-1-303 by the code commission in 2012.

10-1-304. Qualifying participants.

Participants in the Tennessee Electronic Library shall be limited to Tennessee public and not-for-profit, academic and school libraries within Tennessee, and any agency of state government whose mission is to provide support services to public or educational libraries.

Acts 1999, ch. 113, § 1; T.C.A. § 10-1-404.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 10-1-404 was transferred to § 10-1-304 by the code commission in 2012.

10-1-305. Design and implementation.

The design and implementation of the Tennessee Electronic Library shall include the following considerations:

Close cooperation among all participating libraries and agencies;

Use of related federal, state, local, and private sector expertise and funding as appropriate;

A focus on participating library circumstances, opportunities, and solutions;

Minimizing duplication of effort and maximizing cost-savings through centralized and coordinated support and purchasing;

Emphasis on both statewide benefit as well as local benefit; and

Specific goals for the effective and efficient use of technology in public libraries and school libraries to improve the services they provide to the public and to students.

Acts 1999, ch. 113, § 1; T.C.A. § 10-1-405.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 10-1-405 was transferred to § 10-1-305 by the code commission in 2012.

10-1-103. Components of state library system.